Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 7. Fiscal Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Workmen's Compensation § 731.

100 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation §§ 387, 388.

§ 27-14-701.
Worker's compensation account established; investments; administrative expenses; rehabilitation expenses; worker's compensation claims payment account established for worker's compensation revenue bond proceeds.

Except as provided under subsection (f) of this section, all money received, earned or collected pursuant to this act shall be credited to the worker’s compensation account. In addition to other expenditures authorized under this act, amounts deposited within this account shall be used to pay debt service on revenue bonds issued in accordance with W.S.

27-14-704

. As used in this act, “account” means the worker’s compensation account established under this subsection.

All awards and claim determinations shall be paid from the account provided by subsection (a) of this section.

All money collected and accounted for pursuant to this act not immediately necessary for the purposes of this act shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided by law for investment of permanent state funds. The state treasurer, in consultation with the director and consistent with the investment policy developed by the state loan and investment board, may establish a percent not to exceed forty-five percent (45%) of the total amount collected and accounted for under this subsection to be invested in common stock.

Following a general fund appropriation by the legislature for administrative expenses of the division and for administrative expenses of the office of administrative hearings which are attributable to hearing services provided pursuant to this act, amounts expended pursuant to the appropriations shall be transferred monthly from the account provided by subsection (a) of this section to the general fund as provided by the Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act.

The division shall from the worker’s compensation account, periodically advance or reimburse the division of vocational rehabilitation of the department of workforce services, for administrative and program costs associated with the rehabilitation of injured workers pursuant to W.S.

27-14-408

. Administrative or program costs reasonably available or legally allowable under the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, shall not be advanced or reimbursed pursuant to this subsection.

Proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds issued under W.S.

27-14-704

, together with any earnings from the investment of bond proceeds, shall be deposited into the worker’s compensation claims payment account until such bonds are paid or provision for their payment has otherwise been made. Account proceeds may be invested or reinvested by the state treasurer at the direction of the state loan and investment board and may in addition to payment of claims and awards, program and administrative expenses, program reserves and debt service, be used to pay any ongoing and issuance costs of revenue bonds under W.S.

27-14-704

.

The state treasurer, in consultation with the director, shall report to the joint appropriations interim committee not later than December 1, 2016 and every five (5) years thereafter, on the status of the worker’s compensation account and the projected status of the account during the subsequent five (5) year period.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1992, ch. 30, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 81, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 13, § 1, ch. 114, § 1; 2016 ch. 28, § 1, effective March 3, 2016.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” at the end of the first sentence in (a).

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment by ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, in (c), deleted “excluding provisions pertaining to the investment of Wyoming retirement system monies” at the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence and made a related change.

The second 2006 amendment by ch. 114, § 1, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Pursuant to the conflicting laws provision in ch. 114, both have been given effect in their section as set out.

The 2016 amendment

rewrote former second sentence, which read: “The director, in consultation with a qualified independent investment manager, may establish a percent not to exceed forty-five percent (45%) of the total amount collected and accounted for under this subsection to be invested in common stock.” in (c); and added (g).

Laws 2016, ch. 28 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 156, § 2 provides: “There is appropriated fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000.00) from the worker's compensation account established by W.S. 27-14-701(a) and forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000.00) from the highway fund for one (1) full-time position which is authorized to the office of administrative hearings. These appropriations shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. The position shall be included in the office's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget request and the funding shall be included in the department of employment's and department of transportation's standard biennial budgets.”

Laws 2009, ch. 156, § 3 provides: “There is appropriated twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($27,500.00) from the worker's compensation account established by W.S. 27-14-701(a) and twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($22,500.00) from the highway fund for the cost of investigating the acquisition of a case management system capable of accepting and receiving electronic filings and which includes a time management system. No part of this appropriation shall be expended until after the chief information officer has reviewed the proposed expenditure of these funds and the governor has determined the expenditure is appropriate. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 27-14-702.
No garnishment, attachment or execution on unpaid award.

Except as provided under W.S.

27-14-703

, no money paid or payable under this act prior to issuance and delivery of the warrant therefor shall be assigned, charged or taken in execution or by garnishment. Any such assignment, attachment, garnishment or charge is void.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Intestate passage. —

Where injured workman who was awarded lump sum payment for total disability died before treasurer's warrant was issued, such award did not pass to his legal representatives as intestate property. La Chapelle v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 29 Wyo. 449, 214 P. 587,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1923), writ of error dismissed, 264 U.S. 575, 44 S. Ct. 452, 68 L. Ed. 857, 1924 U.S. LEXIS 2566 (U.S. 1924).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of statutory exemptions of proceeds of workmen's compensation awards, 31 ALR3d 532.

Validity, construction, and effect of statutory exemptions of proceeds of workers' compensation awards, 48 ALR5th 473.

§ 27-14-703.
Disclosure of child support obligations required; notification; amount withheld; payment; applicability of provisions.

An injured employee filing a claim for benefits payable under this act shall disclose if he owes child support obligations enforced pursuant to a plan described in 42 U.S.C. § 654 and approved under 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq. If the employee owes child support obligations and is awarded benefits, the division shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency operating pursuant to a plan described in 42 U.S.C. § 654 and enforcing the obligation that the employee is eligible for benefits.

The division shall withhold from benefits payable to an employee owing child support obligations:

The amount specified by the employee to the division to be withheld under this subsection;

The amount determined pursuant to an agreement under 42 U.S.C. § 654(19)(B)(i) and submitted to the division by the state or local child support enforcement agency; or

Any amount otherwise required to be withheld from benefits payable under this act pursuant to legal process defined under 42 U.S.C. § 662(e) [repealed] and properly served upon the division.

Any amount withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid by the division to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency, treated as if paid to the employee as benefits under this act and as if paid by the employee to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of his child support obligations.

This section applies only if arrangements are made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for administrative costs incurred by the division attributable to child support obligations enforced by the agency.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

42 U.S.C. 662(e), referred to in paragraph (b)(iii), was repealed by P.L. 104-193.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law § 89.08 (Matthew Bender).

§ 27-14-704.
Worker's compensation revenue bonds; department determination; issuance by state loan and investment board; bonding procedure, terms and conditions.

The department may upon determining that the issuance of revenue bonds would be financially beneficial to the worker’s compensation account and that bond issuance would not negatively impact employer contribution rates to the account, request the state loan and investment board to issue worker’s compensation revenue bonds to fund awards and claims, program and administrative expenses and program reserves. Upon receipt of a request under this subsection, the state loan and investment board shall review the department’s determination and if it concurs with the determination, the board may issue worker’s compensation revenue bonds in one (1) or more series not to exceed an aggregate amount of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00). The net proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall after payment of issuance costs, be deposited into the worker’s compensation claims payment account established under W.S. 27-14-701(f).

Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section are limited obligations payable solely from and secured by funds deposited within the worker’s compensation account as created under W.S. 27-14-701(a) and the worker’s compensation claims payment account. The bondholders may not look to any general or other fund for payment of the bonds except for revenues pledged therefor. The revenue bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation. The bonds shall not be considered or held to be general obligations of the state but shall constitute limited obligations of the state and the board shall not pledge the state’s full faith and credit for payment of the bonds. Each series of bonds may be issued by the board at public or private sale, in denominations and registered form, with such provision for conversion or exchange, for establishing interest rates or methods of determining rates on a variable or fixed rate basis, for establishing maturities and redemption provisions, as determined by the board. The bonds shall be payable at the office of a fiscal agent designated by the board. The state loan and investment board shall not issue any revenue bonds under this section unless the sale results in an economic benefit to the worker’s compensation program as determined by the board. In all other respects, the board may prescribe the form and terms of the revenue bonds and shall do whatever is lawful and necessary for their issuance and payment. Action taken by the board under this section shall be approved by a majority of its members.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 81, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), deleted “at the office of the state treasurer or” following “bonds shall be payable” in the third from last sentence.